Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-807
Misrepresentations for aid; penalty.

Any person who shall make any false statement to the county board or to the board provided for in sections 10-801 to 10-807, or to any of its assistants or employees, for the purpose of obtaining a loan or aid of any kind, as a sufferer from cyclone, tornado or destructive windstorm, shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 1913, c. 229, § 4, p. 664;

R.S.1913, § 474;

C.S.1922, § 391;

C.S.1929, § 11-1004;

R.S.1943, § 10-807;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 70.